tables/hu-exceptionwords.cti
#ny, nny related exceptions
#Following exception parts need marking nny letter pairs with single n and nny braille dot combinations
partword mikronny 134-24-13-1235-135-1345-1246	For example mikronnyi word
partword pergamennyal 1234-15-1235-1245-1-134-15-1345-1246-1-123	For example pergamennyaláb word
begword \x00ednny\x00fajt 34-1345-1246-346-245-2345	For example ínnyújtó, ínnyújtót words
begword \x00ednnyujt 34-1345-1246-136-245-2345	For example ínnyújtó, ínnyújtót words
partword indi\x00e1nny 24-1345-145-24-4-1345-1246	For example indiánnyelven, indiánnyelv words
partword kal\x00e1nnyel 13-1-123-4-1345-1246-15-123	For example főzőkalánnyelet word
begword filigr\x00e1nny 124-24-123-24-1245-1235-4-1345-1246	For example filigránnyelű word
partword lennyil 123-15-1345-1246-24-123	For example ellennyilatkozat word
partword lennyom 123-15-1345-1246-135-134	For example ellennyomás word
partword lennyug 123-15-1345-1246-136-1245
partword nnyol 1345-1246-135-123	For example nyolcvannyolc word
partword tennyil 2345-15-1345-1246-24-123	For example istennyila word
partword anny\x00fa 1-1345-1246-346
partword l\x00f6nnyom 123-12345-1345-1246-135-134
partword g\x00e1nnyug 1245-4-1345-1246-136-1245	For example magánnyugdíjpénztár word
partword g\x00e1nnyo 1245-4-1345-1246-135
partword idegennyel 24-145-15-1245-15-1345-1246-15-123
partword \x00ednnyom 34-1345-1246-135-134	For example színnyomás word
partword annyel 1-1345-1246-15-123
partword t\x00e1nnyom 2345-4-1345-1246-135-134	For example utánnyomás word
begword penny 1234-15-1345-1345-13456
endword penny 1234-15-1345-1345-13456	For example english penny beginning words need this exception
word penny 1234-15-1345-1345-13456	For example english penny beginning words need this exception
word pennys 1234-15-1345-1345-13456-234	For example english pennys beginning words need this exception
endword pennys 1234-15-1345-1345-13456-234	For example english end of pennys words need this exception
word pennyt 1234-15-1345-1345-13456-2345	For example english pennyt beginning words need this exception
endword pennyt 1234-15-1345-1345-13456-2345	For example english end of pennyt beginning words need this exception
word pennyst 1234-15-1345-1345-13456-234-2345
endword pennyst 1234-15-1345-1345-13456-234-2345
partword pennysek 1234-15-1345-1345-13456-234-15-13
partword pennybe 1234-15-1345-1345-13456-12-15
partword penny\x00e9r 1234-15-1345-1345-13456-16-1235
partword pennyj 1234-15-1345-1345-13456-245
partword pennyk 1234-15-1345-1345-13456-13
partword pennyn 1234-15-1345-1345-13456-1345
partword pennyre 1234-15-1345-1345-13456-1235-15
partword pennyve 1234-15-1345-1345-13456-1236-15
partword pennys\x00e9rt 1234-15-1345-1345-13456-234-16-1235-2345
partword pennysse 1234-15-1345-1345-13456-234-234-15
partword trichinny 2345-1235-24-14-125-24-1345-1246	For example trichinnyavalya word
always company 14-135-134-1234-1-1345-13456	English company word
begword azonnyom 1-126-135-1345-1246-135-134	For example azonnyomban beginning words
begword rubinny 1235-136-12-24-1345-1246	For example rubinnyaklánc word
partword kartonny 13-1-1235-2345-135-1345-1246	For example kartonnyi word
begword l\x00e9ptenny 123-16-1234-2345-15-1345-1246	For example léptennyomon word
partword agyonny 1-1456-135-1345-1246	For example agyonnyom, agyonnyomja, agyonnyúzott, agyonnyűtt words
begword b\x00f6rt\x00f6nny 12-12345-1235-2345-12345-1345-1246	For example börtönnyelve word
partword mikrofonny 134-24-13-1235-135-124-135-1345-1246	For example mikrofonnyílás word
partword szalonnyel 156-1-123-135-1345-1246-15-123	For example szalonnyelv, szalonnyelven words
partword vagonny 1236-1-1245-135-1345-1246	For example vagonnyi word
partword kamionny 13-1-134-24-135-1345-1246	For example kamionnyi word
partword kabinnyom 13-1-12-24-1345-1246-135-134	For example kabinnyomás word
partword kabinny\x00edl 13-1-12-24-1345-1246-34-123	For example kabinnyíláson word
partword gallonny 1245-1-123-123-135-1345-1246	For example tízgallonnyi word
partword arinnyel 1-1235-24-1345-1246-15-123	For example mandarinnyelv word
begword b\x0171n 12-23456-1345	For example bűnnyomok word
partword mag\x00e1nnyel 134-1-1245-4-1345-1246-15-123	For example magánnyelvmesterek word
partword oroszl\x00e1nnyo 135-1235-135-156-123-4-1345-1246-135	For example oroszlánnyom word
partword \x00f6nnyom 12345-1345-1246-135-134	For example önnyomása, önnyomatú words

#ly related exceptions
#This exception parts need marking ly letters with two single l and y letter combination
always hollywood 125-135-123-123-13456-2456-135-135-145	English hollywood word need this exception
partword sually 234-136-1-123-123-13456	For example visually word

#sz letter pair related exceptions
#This exception list containing words or word parts need using single s and z letter dot combinations
begmidword alv\x00e1sz 1-123-1236-4-234-126	For example alvászavar word need this exception
begmidword er\x0151forr\x00e1sz 15-1235-12456-124-135-1235-1235-4-234-126	For example erőforrászabáló word need this exception
always ev\x00e9szavar 15-1236-16-234-126-1-1236-1-1235	For example evészavar word need this exception
begword f\x00e1kly\x00e1s 124-4-13-456-4-234	For example fáklyászene word need this exception
begword gyalogos 1456-1-123-135-1245-135-234	For example gyalogoszászlóalj, gyalogosszázad words need this exception, gyalogos beginning word parts need handling gyalogos word part with single part
partword tokosz\x00e1szl 2345-135-13-135-234-126-4-156-123
begword hall\x00e1s 125-1-123-123-4-234	For example hallászavar word need this exception
always k\x00f6r\x00f6szug 13-12345-1235-12345-234-126-136-1245	For example Köröszug word need this exception
begword l\x00e1t\x00e1s 123-4-2345-4-234	For example látászavar word need this exception
begword magatart\x00e1s 134-1-1245-1-2345-1-1235-2345-4-234
always maroszug 134-1-1235-135-234-126-136-1245	For example Maroszug word need this exception
always m\x0171k\x00f6d\x00e9s 134-23456-13-12345-145-16-234	For example működészavar word need this exception
begword ny\x00edl\x00e1s 1246-34-123-4-234	For example nyílászáró word need this exception
always ritmusz 1235-24-2345-134-136-234-126	For example ritmuszavar word need this exception
begword vas 1236-1-234	vas beginning words need handling single part the vas word part for braille translation, example words are vaszár, vasszekrény, vasszerkezet words
begword vaszil 1236-1-156-24-123
begword von\x00f3s 1236-135-1345-246-234	For example vonószenekar, vonósszerenád words need handlin vonós word part with single part
begword p\x00e9nzes 1234-16-1345-126-15-234	For example pénzeszacskó, pénzeszsák words need this exception
partword viselked\x00e9s 1236-24-234-15-123-13-15-145-16-234	For example viselkedészavar, viselkedésszerű words need this exception to handling this words with two word for braille translation
always \x00fcl\x00e9ssz 12356-123-16-234-156	For example ülésszak word
partword ugasszer 136-1245-1-234-156-15-1235	For example lugasszerű word
partword sszekr\x00e9ny 234-156-15-13-1235-16-1246	For example kisszekrény word
begword pilissz 1234-24-123-24-234-156	For example Pilisszántó, Pilisszentkereszt town names
always h\x00fasszag 125-346-234-156-1-1245	For example hússzag, hússzagú, emberhússzagot words
partword szacsk 234-126-1-146-13	For example chipseszacskó, liszteszacskó, vizeleteszacskó words
partword keres\x00e9ssz 13-15-1235-15-234-16-234-156	For example keresésszolgáltató word
partword szorong\x00e1ssz 156-135-1235-135-1345-1245-4-234-156	For example szorongásszerű, szorongásszint word

#szs related exceptions
#This exception list containing some words with need using single s and zs braille dots
partword szs\x00e1k 234-345-4-13	This exception needs for szsák word part containing words, for example kenyereszsák, szerszámoszsák, szennyeszsák words
begword sonk\x00e1szs 234-135-1345-13-4-234-345	For example sonkászsemle word need this exception
begword vizeszs 1236-24-126-15-234-345	For example vizeszsemle word need this exception
partword identit\x00e1s 24-145-15-1345-2345-24-2345-4-234	For example identitászavar word need this exception
partword sert\x00e9szs 234-15-1235-2345-16-234-345	For example sertészsír word
partword t\x00e1szsin 2345-4-234-345-24-1345	For example gyújtászsinór word
partword rvaszs\x00edr 1235-1236-1-234-345-34-1235	For example szarvaszsír word
always kiszombor 13-24-234-126-135-134-12-135-1235	For example Kiszombor, Kiszomboron town names
partword sz\x00f6ld 234-126-12345-123-145	For example haragoszöld, mohaszöld, piszkoszöld word
partword gr\x00e1n\x00e1tosz 1245-1235-4-1345-4-2345-135-234-126	For example gránátoszászlóalj word
partword ozg\x00e1sza 135-126-1245-4-234-126-1		For example mozgászavar word
begword m\x00e1gnes 134-4-1245-1345-15-234	For example mágneszár, nágnesszalag, mágnesszerű words need this exception
begword piros 1234-24-1235-135-234	For example piroszászlós word need this 
begword pirosszk 1234-24-1235-135-156-156-13	Pirosszka is a movie film name
begword v\x00f6r\x00f6s 1236-12345-1235-12345-234	For example vöröszászló word
partword t\x00edpuszub 2345-34-1234-136-234-126-136-12	For example típuszubbony word
begword \x00e1rgus 4-1235-1245-136-234	For example árgusszemű word
partword dragonyos 145-1235-1-1245-135-1246-135-234	For example dragonyoszászlóalj, dragonyosszázad words
partword egyenes 15-1456-15-1345-15-234	For example egyenesszárnyúak word
partword k\x00e9pz\x00e9s 13-16-1234-126-16-234	For example képzésszervezés, képzésszerű words
partword fedez\x00e9ssz 124-15-145-15-126-16-234-156	For example felfedezésszámba word
partword fuvaros 124-136-1236-1-1235-135-234	For example fuvarosszekér word
partword koldus 13-135-123-145-136-234	For example koldusszáj, koldusszakáll, kolduszene words
begword tetsz\x00e9s 2345-15-2345-156-16-234	For example tetszészaj, tetszészsivaj words need this general exception
always v\x00e1roszaj 1236-4-1235-135-234-126-1-245	For example városzajon, városzajt words
partword v\x00e1roszs 1236-4-1235-135-234-345	For example városzsarnok word
